District of Columbia statutes.
43-113

Grants and bequests for care of lots.

It shall be lawful for such association to take and hold any grant, donation, or bequest upon trust to apply the income thereof, under the direction of the board of managers, for the embellishment, preservation, renewal, or repair of any tomb, monument, gravestone, or other structure, fence, railing, or other inclosure in or around any cemetery lot, or for the planting and cultivation of any trees, shrubs, flowers, or plants in or around any cemetery lot, according to the terms of such grant, donation, or bequest; and the court having probate jurisdiction shall have full power and jurisdiction to compel the due performance of such trusts, or any of them, upon a bill filed by the proprietor of any lot in such cemetery for that purpose.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1295, ch. 854, § 669
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 576, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 158(c)(3)
This section is referenced in § 19-904 and § 19-1304.09.
1981 Ed., § 27-113.
1973 Ed., § 27-113.